backend/sq_AL_cleaned.aff
SFX P0 Y 36
SFX P0 l-administrativ le-administrative l-administrativ po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 l-administrativ lë-administrativë l-administrativ po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 l-patriarkal le-patriarkale l-patriarkal po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 l-patriarkal lë-patriarkalë l-patriarkal po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-argjilor re-argjilore r-argjilor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-argjilor rë-argjilorë r-argjilor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-artistik re-artistike r-artistik po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-artistik rë-artistikë r-artistik po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-edukativ re-edukative r-edukativ po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-edukativ rë-edukativë r-edukativ po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-frazeologjik re-frazeologjike r-frazeologjik po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-frazeologjik rë-frazeologjikë r-frazeologjik po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-industrial re-industriale r-industrial po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-industrial rë-industrialë r-industrial po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-kënetor re-kënetore r-kënetor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-kënetor rë-kënetorë r-kënetor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-kulturor re-kulturore r-kulturor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-kulturor rë-kulturorë r-kulturor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-ndajshtimor re-ndajshtimore r-ndajshtimor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-ndajshtimor rë-ndajshtimorë r-ndajshtimor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-popullor re-popullore r-popullor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-popullor rë-popullorë r-popullor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-shkencor re-shkencore r-shkencor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-shkencor rë-shkencorë r-shkencor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 r-zallor re-zallore r-zallor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 r-zallor rë-zallorë r-zallor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 s-historik se-historike s-historik po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 s-historik s-historikë s-historik po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 t-leninist te-leniniste t-leninist po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 t-leninist të-leninistë t-leninist po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 v-ekzekutiv ve-ekzekutive v-ekzekutiv po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 v-ekzekutiv vë-ekzekutivë v-ekzekutiv po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 v-mësimor ve-mësimore v-mësimor po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 v-mësimor vë-mësimorë v-mësimor po:adj is:pl is:mas
SFX P0 v-politik ve-politike v-politik po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX P0 v-politik vë-politikë v-politik po:adj is:pl is:mas

SFX Q0 Y 1
SFX Q0 0 0 po:adj

SFX Q1 Y 2
SFX Q1 0 e [^ë] po:adj is:pl is:fem
SFX Q1 ë e ë po:adj is:pl is:fem

SFX Q2 Y 1
SFX Q2 0 ë [bcçdfgqhjklmnprstvz] po:adj is:pl is:mas

SFX Q3 Y 2
SFX Q3 0 ë [^r] po:adj is:sg is:fem
SFX Q3 ër ra ër po:adj is:pl is:fem

# EMRAT ASNJ. / PACAK.

SFX Q4 Y 3
SFX Q4 0 ët er po:noun po:asnj
SFX Q4 0 t [aeë] po:noun po:asnj
SFX Q4 sh jt ush po:undf is:sg is:mas

SFX Q5 Y 16
SFX Q5 0 i d po:undf is:sg
SFX Q5 0 n [ëi] po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q5 0 t [ëi] po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q5 a ën [lr]a po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 a ës [lr]a po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 ër rën ër po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 ër rës ër po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 ër ra ër po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q5 tër rash ër po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q5 tër rave ër po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q5 ido ëndo ido po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 ido ësdo ido po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q5 ido indo ido po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q5 ido itdo ido po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q5 shdo jtdo shdo po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q5 ush ë ush po:undf is:sg is:mas

SFX Q6 Y 3
SFX Q6 0 it [rt] po:asnj
SFX Q6 0 të [ghiq] po:asnj
SFX Q6 0 ve [ëa] po:undf is:pl is:mas

SFX Q7 Y 12
SFX Q7 0 n thë po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q7 0 s thë po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q7 ë a thë po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q7 0 u ri po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q7 0 t la po:undf is:sg is:fem
SFX Q7 0 ve la po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q7 i ët li po:undf is:pl is:mas
SFX Q7 i ve li po:undf is:pl is:mas
SFX Q7 ido atdo ido po:undf is:pl is:fem
SFX Q7 ido ëtdo ido po:undf is:pl is:mas
SFX Q7 ush ënd ush po:undf is:sg is:mas
SFX Q7 ushdo ëdo shdo po:undf is:sg is:mas

# PËREMRAT

SFX Q8 Y 1
SFX Q8 0 0 po:pron

# PARAFJALËT

SFX Q9 Y 1
SFX Q9 0 0 po:prep

SFX N Y 2
SFX N 0 ën .
SFX N 0 ë .

SFX R Y 2
SFX R 0 r .
SFX R 0 re .

# NDAJFOLJET

SFX R0 Y 8
SFX R0 0 0 po:adv
SFX R0 s zi as po:adv
SFX R0 ë a itë po:adv
SFX R0 ë-copë a-copa ë-copë po:adv
SFX R0 ë-palë a-pala ë-palë po:adv
SFX R0 ë-petë a-peta ë-petë po:adv
SFX R0 ë-pikë a-pika ë-pikë po:adv
SFX R0 ë-tufë a-tufa ë-tufë po:adv

# PJESORET

SFX R1 Y 1
SFX R1 0 0 po:pjes

# LIDHËZAT

SFX R2 Y 1
SFX R2 0 0 po:lidh

# PASTHIRRMAT

SFX R3 Y 1
SFX R3 0 0 po:psth

# EMRAT PANDR.

SFX R4 Y 1
SFX R4 0 0 po:pndr

# NUMRAT

SFX R5 Y 1
SFX R5 0 0 po:num

# ONOMATOPET

SFX R6 Y 1
SFX R6 0 0 po:onom

# SHKURTIMET

SFX R7 Y 1
SFX R7 0 0 po:abbr

# ANGL

SFX R8 Y 1
SFX R8 0 0 po:engl

# FREN

SFX R9 Y 1
SFX R9 0 0 po:fren

# GJER

SFX S1 Y 1
SFX S1 0 0 po:ger

# ITAL

SFX S2 Y 1
SFX S2 0 0 po:ita

# LAT

SFX S3 Y 1
SFX S3 0 0 po:lat

# EMRAT PACAK.

SFX S4 Y 1
SFX S4 0 0 po:undf

# EMRAT ASNJ.

SFX S5 Y 1
SFX S5 0 0 po:asnj

# RREGULL. 16.4.2013 > https://gazetadielli.com/ja-cfare-do-te-ndryshoje-nga-shqipja-standarte/

SFX V1 Y 1
SFX V1 0 0 po:rreg

# RREGULL. 14.3.2014 > http://www.ashak.org/?cid=1,2,453

SFX V2 Y 1
SFX V2 0 0 po:rreg

# PËRPARA

PFX Sa Y 2
PFX Sa 0 bashk [aeiouy]
PFX Sa 0 bashkë [^aeiouy]

PFX Sb Y 2
PFX Sb 0 gjysm [aeou]
PFX Sb 0 gjysmë [^aeou]

PFX Sc Y 1
PFX Sc 0 krye .

PFX Sd Y 2
PFX Sd r kundër r
PFX Sd 0 kundër [^r]

PFX Se Y 1
PFX Se 0 mbi .

PFX Sf Y 1
PFX Sf 0 ndihmës .

PFX Sg Y 1
PFX Sg 0 nën .

PFX Sh Y 1
PFX Sh 0 ri .

PFX Si Y 2
PFX Si 0 zëvendës .
PFX Si 0 zëvendëskrye [mr][ei][dn]
